Hawaii statutes.
[§386-71.6] Workers' compensation
benefits facilitator unit. (a) There is established within the department
of labor and industrial relations the workers' compensation benefits
facilitator unit. All professional and clerical employees of the unit shall be
appointed by the director and shall be subject to chapter 76.

(b) Facilitators of the unit shall have the
following duties and responsibilities:

(1) Assist injured workers in filing their workers'
compensation claims under this chapter;

(2) Assist insurers, employers, and providers; and

(3) Facilitate the workers' compensation claims
process.

(c) All expenses incurred by the director in
establishing the unit shall be paid from the special compensation fund. [L
1996, c 260, §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next